test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-alonw13_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - alonõ: # Noun (13) alonõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     alonõ+N+Sg+Nom: alonõ
     alonõ+N+Sg+Gen: alodsõ
     alonõ+N+Sg+Par: alost
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ill: [alotsõhe, alotsõdõ]
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ine: [alotsõn, alotsõh, alotsõhn]
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ade: alotsõl
     alonõ+N+Sg+Abl: alotsõlt
     alonõ+N+Sg+Tra: alotsõs
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ter: alotsõniq
     alonõ+N+Sg+Abe: alotsõldaq
     alonõ+N+Sg+Com: [alotsõgaq, alodsõgaq]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Nom: alodsõq
     alonõ+N+Pl+Gen: [alotsidõ, alotsiidõ, alostõ]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Par: [alotsit, alotsiid]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ill: [alotsihe, alotsiihe, alotsiidõ, alostõhe, alostõdõ]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ine: [alotsin, alotsih, alotsihn, alotsiin, alotsiih, alotsiihn, alostõn, alostõh, alostõhn]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ela: [alotsist, alotsiist, alostõst]
     alonõ+N+Pl+All: [alotsilõ, alotsiilõ, alostõlõ]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ade: [alotsil, alotsiil, alostõl]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Abl: [alotsilt, alotsiilt, alostõlt]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Tra: [alotsis, alotsiis, alostõs]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ter: [alotsiniq, alotsiiniq, alostõniq]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Abe: [alotsildaq, alotsiildaq, alostõldaq]
     alonõ+N+Pl+Com: [alotsidõgaq, alotsiidõgaq, alostõgaq]
